California statutes. Public Contract Code
 requirements promulgated in conformance with this section, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 711 of the Statutes of 2003. The mechanisms explored may include, but not be limited to, authorization to contract with a competent nonprofit organization that is neither funded nor controlled, in whole or in part, by a corporation that is engaged in the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or the procurement of equipment, materials, or supplies. The Department of Industrial Relations, in complying with this paragraph, shall also consider any feasible and cost-effective monitoring measures that will encourage compliance with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct.

(5) To ensure public access and confidence, the Department of Industrial Relations shall ensure public awareness and access to proposed contracts by
 postings on the Internet and through communication to advocates for garment workers, unions, and other interested parties. The appropriate agencies shall establish a mechanism for soliciting and reviewing any information indicating violations of the Sweatfree Code of Conduct by prospective or current bidders, contractors, or subcontractors. The agencies shall make their findings public when they reject allegations against bidding or contracting parties.

(6) Contractors shall ensure that their subcontractors comply in writing with the Sweatfree Code of Conduct, under penalty of perjury. Contractors shall attach a copy of the Sweatfree Code of Conduct to the certification required by subdivision (a).

(g) No state agency may enter into a contract with any contractor unless the
 contractor meets the following requirements:

(1) Contractors and subcontractors in California shall comply with all appropriate state laws concerning wages, workplace safety, rights to association and assembly, and nondiscrimination standards as well as appropriate federal laws. Contractors based in other states in the United States shall comply with all appropriate laws of their states and appropriate federal laws. For contractors whose locations for manufacture or assembly are outside the United States, those contractors shall ensure that their subcontractors comply with the appropriate laws of countries where the facilities are located.

(2) Contractors and subcontractors shall maintain a policy of not terminating any employee except for just cause, and employees shall
 have access to a mediator or to a mediation process to resolve certain workplace disputes that are not regulated by the National Labor Relations Board.

(3) Contractors and subcontractors shall ensure that workers are paid, at a minimum, wages and benefits in compliance with applicable local, state, and national laws of the jurisdiction in which the labor, on behalf of the contractor or subcontractor, is performed. Whenever a state agency expends funds for the procurement or laundering of apparel, garments, or corresponding accessories, or the procurement of equipment, materials, or supplies, other than procurement related to a public works contract, the applicable labor standards established by the local jurisdiction through the exercise of either local police powers or local spending powers in which the labor, in compliance with the contract or
 purchase order for which the expenditure is made, is performed shall apply with regard to the contract or purchase order for which the expenditure is made, unless the applicable local standards are in conflict with, or are explicitly preempted by, state law. A state agency may not require, as a condition for the receipt of state funds or assistance, that a local jurisdiction refrain from applying the labor standards that are otherwise applicable to that local jurisdiction. The Department of Industrial Relations may, without incurring additional expenses, access information from any nonprofit organization, including, but not limited to, the World Bank, that gathers and disseminates data with respect to wages paid throughout the world, to allow the Department of Industrial Relations to determine whether contractors and subcontractors are compensating their employees at a level that enables those employees
 to live above the applicable poverty level.

(4) All contractors and subcontractors shall comply with the overtime laws and regulations of the country in which their employees are working.

(5) All overtime hours shall be worked voluntarily. Workers shall be compensated for overtime at either (A) the rate of compensation for regular hours of work, or (B) as legally required in the country of manufacture, whichever is greater.

(6) No person may be employed who is younger than the legal age for children to work in the country in which the facility is located. In no case may children under the age of 15 years be employed in the manufacturing process. Where the age for completing compulsory education is higher than the
 standard for the minimum age of employment, the age for completing education shall apply to this section.

(7) There may be no form of forced labor of any kind, including slave labor, prison labor, indentured labor, or bonded labor, including forced overtime hours.

(8) The work environment shall be safe and healthy and, at a minimum, be in compliance with relevant local, state, and national laws. If residential facilities are provided to workers, those facilities shall be safe and healthy as well.

(9) There may be no discrimination in hiring, salary, benefits,
 performance evaluation, discipline, promotion, retirement, or dismissal on the basis of age, sex, pregnancy, maternity leave status, marital status, race, nationality, country of origin, ethnic origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, or political opinion.

(10) No worker may be subjected to any physical, sexual, psychological, or verbal harassment or abuse, including corporal punishment, under any circumstances, including, but not limited to, retaliation for exercising their right to free speech and assembly.

(11) No worker may be forced to use contraceptives or take pregnancy tests. No worker may be exposed to chemicals, including glues and solvents, that endanger reproductive health.

(12) Contractors and bidders shall list the names and addresses of each subcontractor to be utilized in the performance of the contract, and list each manufacturing or other facility or operation of the contractor or subcontractor for performance of the contract. The list, which shall be maintained and updated to show any changes in subcontractors during the term of the contract, shall provide company names, owners or officers, addresses, telephone numbers, e-mail addresses, and the nature of the business association.

(h) Any person who certifies as true any material matter pursuant to this section that they know to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(i) The provisions of this section, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 711 of the Statutes of 2003, shall be in
 addition to any other provisions that authorize the prosecution and enforcement of local labor laws and may not be interpreted to prohibit a local prosecutor from bringing a criminal or civil action against an individual or business that violates the provisions of this section.

(j) (1) The certification requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) and (f) do not apply to a credit card purchase of goods of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less.

(2) The total amount of exemption authorized herein shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per year for each company from which a state agency is purchasing goods by credit card. It shall be the responsibility of each state agency to monitor the use of this exemption and adhere to these
 restrictions on these purchases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 63.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6109.

(a) A public entity, as defined in Section 1100, may not permit a contractor or subcontractor who is ineligible to bid or work on, or be awarded, a public works project pursuant to Section 1777.1 or 1777.7 of the Labor Code to bid on, be awarded, or perform work as a subcontractor on, a public works project. Every public works project shall contain a provision prohibiting a contractor from performing work on a public works project with a subcontractor who is ineligible to perform work on the public works project pursuant to Section 1777.1 or
 1777.7 of the Labor Code.

(b) Any contract on a public works project entered into between a contractor and a debarred subcontractor is void as a matter of law. A debarred subcontractor may not receive any public money for performing work as a subcontractor on a public works contract, and any public money that may have been paid to a debarred subcontractor by a contractor on the project shall be returned to the awarding body. The contractor shall be responsible for the payment of wages to workers of a debarred subcontractor who has been allowed to work on the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 443, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6610.

Notice inviting formal bids for projects by a public agency that include a requirement for any type of mandatory prebid conference, site visit, or meeting shall include the time, date, and location of the mandatory prebid site visit, conference or meeting, and when and where project documents, including final plans and specifications are available. Any mandatory prebid site visit, conference or meeting shall not occur within a minimum of five calendar days of the publication of the initial notice. This provision shall not apply to the Regents of the University of
 California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 159, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6611.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of General Services may, relative to contracts for goods, services, information technology, and telecommunications, use a negotiation process if the department finds that one or more of the following conditions exist:

(1) The business need or purpose of a procurement or contract can be further defined as a result of a negotiation process.

(2) The business need or purpose of a procurement or contract is known by the department, but a negotiation process may identify different types of solutions to fulfill this business need or purpose.

(3) The complexity of the purpose or need suggests a bidder’s costs to prepare and develop a solicitation response are extremely high.

(4) The business need or purpose of a procurement or contract is known by the department, but negotiation is necessary to ensure that the department is receiving the best value or the most cost-efficient goods, services, information technology, and telecommunications.

(b) When it is in the best interests of the state, the department may negotiate amendments to the terms and conditions, including scope of work, of existing contracts for goods, services, information technology, and telecommunications, whether or not the original contract was the result of competition, on behalf of itself or another state agency.

(c) (1) The department shall establish the procedures and guidelines for the negotiation process described in subdivision (a). Those procedures and guidelines shall include, but not be limited to, a clear description of the methodology that will be used by the department to evaluate a bid for the procurement of goods, services, information technology, and telecommunications.

(2) The procedures and guidelines described in paragraph (1) may include provisions that authorize the department to receive supplemental bids after the initial bids are opened. If the procedures and guidelines include these provisions, the procedures and guidelines shall specify the conditions under which supplemental bids may be received by the department.

(d) An unsuccessful bidder shall have no right to protest the results of the negotiating process undertaken pursuant to this section. As a remedy, an unsuccessful bidder may file a petition for a writ of mandate in accordance with Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The venue for the petition for a writ of mandate shall be Sacramento, California. An action filed pursuant to this subdivision shall be given preference by the court.

(e) (1) The Department of Technology may utilize the negotiation process described in subdivisions (a) and (b) for the purpose of procuring information technology and telecommunications goods and services on behalf of state departments and information technology projects.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to supersede the department’s existing statutory control over procurement processes as dictated in Section 12100.

(f) On or before January 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the Department of Technology shall report to the relevant budget subcommittees of each house of the Legislature on the use of subdivision (e) during budget hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 335, Sec. 2.   (SB 1505)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6615.

For all state contracts, and, to the extent feasible, all federally funded contracts awarded pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290), Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10700), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12100), Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 12120), and Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 12125) of Part 2 of Division 2 shall be in compliance with Section 12205.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.3. Construction Manager/General Contractor Authority: Department of Transportation [6700. - 6708.]

6700.

(a) This chapter provides for an alternative procurement procedure for certain transportation projects performed by the Department of Transportation. 

(b) The Construction Manager/General Contractor method allows the department to engage a construction manager during the design process to provide input on the design. During the design phase, the construction manager provides advice including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the department to design a more constructible project.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that utilizing a Construction Manager/General Contractor method requires a clear understanding of the roles and responsibilities of each participant in the
 process. The Legislature also finds and declares that cost-effective benefits are achieved by shifting the liability and risk for cost containment and project schedule to the construction manager and by permitting the coherent phasing of projects into discrete contract increments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 465, Sec. 2.   (SB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

(a) The Construction Manager/General Contractor method provided by this chapter may be used by the department, but is not limited to, when it is anticipated that the Construction Manager/General Contractor method will reduce project costs or expedite project completion in a manner that is not achievable through the design-bid-build method. Notwithstanding any other law, for projects utilizing the Construction Manager/General Contractor method provided by this chapter, the department shall advertise, award, and administer the Construction Manager/General Contractor contract. The department shall not delegate the contracting authority, except for the two projects reserved for projects in the County of Riverside as provided for in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The department may use the Construction Manager/General Contractor method for projects that have construction costs greater than ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(2) Consistent with Provision 2 of Item 2660-110-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016, as amended by Chapter 7 of the Statutes of 2017, two projects shall be authorized for projects in the County of Riverside and the Riverside County Transportation Commission may use the Construction Manager/General Contractor method for these projects, with the first priority for the projects listed in that budget item.

(c) On at least two-thirds of the projects delivered by the department utilizing the Construction Manager/General Contractor method provided by this chapter, the department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform all
 project design and engineering services related to design required for Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution. On all projects delivered by the department, the department shall use department employees or consultants under contract with the department to perform all construction inspection services required for Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery consistent with Article XXII of the California Constitution. Department resources, including personnel requirements, necessary to perform all services described in this subdivision shall be included in the department’s capital outlay support program for workload purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(d) (1) The department shall prepare and submit to the Legislature an interim report no later than July 1, 2021, that describes
 each Construction Manager/General Contractor project approved under this chapter as of January 1, 2021, and that provides relevant data, including, but not limited to, district, cost, the stage of completion, and estimated time to completion. The department shall also prepare and submit to the Legislature a final report, no later than July 1, 2025, that provides the same relevant data for projects that were approved under this chapter as of January 1, 2025. Both the interim and final reports shall also provide a comprehensive assessment on the effectiveness of the Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery method relative to project cost and time savings.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 465, Sec. 3.   (SB 1262)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Construction manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is a licensed contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and that is able to provide, or that contracts with entities that are able to provide, appropriately licensed
 contracting or engineering services, or both appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services, as needed pursuant to a Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract.

(b) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” means a project delivery method in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as the contract for preconstruction services, or at a later time. The execution of the design and
 the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Transportation as established under Part 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) “Preconstruction services” means advice during the design phase including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the department to design a more constructible project.

(e) “Project” means the construction of a highway, bridge, or tunnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.   (AB 1475)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6703.

Construction Manager/General Contractor method projects shall progress as follows:

(a) (1) The department shall establish a procedure for the evaluation and selection of a construction manager through a request for qualifications (RFQ). The RFQ shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) If the entity is a partnership, limited partnership, or other association, a list of all of the partners, general partners, or association members known at the time of the bid submission who will participate in the Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract, including, but not limited to, subcontractors.

(B) Evidence that the members of the entity have completed, or demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the construction of the project, as well as a financial statement that assures the department that the entity has the capacity to complete the project, construction expertise, and an acceptable safety record.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to construct the project, including information on the revocation or suspension of any license, registration, or credential.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the
 entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Any prior serious or willful violation of the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973, contained in Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code, or the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596), settled against any member of the entity, and information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) Information concerning any debarment, disqualification, or removal from a federal, state, or local government public works project. Any instance in which an entity, its owners, officers, or managing employees submitted a bid on a public works
 project and were found to be nonresponsive, or were found by an awarding body not to be a responsible bidder.

(G) Any instance in which the entity, or its owners, officers, or managing employees, defaulted on a construction contract.

(H) Any violations of the Contractors’ State License Law (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), excluding alleged violations of federal or state law including the payment of wages, benefits, apprenticeship requirements, or personal income tax withholding, or of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act (26 U.S.C. Sec. 3101, et seq.) withholding requirements settled against any member of the entity.

(I) Information concerning the
 bankruptcy or receivership of any member of the entity, including information concerning any work completed by a surety.

(J) Information concerning all settled adverse claims, disputes, or lawsuits between the owner of a public works project and any member of the entity during the five years preceding submission of a bid pursuant to this section, in which the claim, settlement, or judgment exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). Information shall also be provided concerning any work completed by a surety during this period.

(K) In the case of a partnership or other association that is not a legal entity, a copy of the agreement creating the partnership or association and specifying that all partners or association members agree to be fully liable for the performance under the
 contract.

(L) For the purposes of this paragraph, a construction manager’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if the manager’s experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and the manager’s average total recordable injury/illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the manager is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(2) The information required pursuant to this subdivision shall be verified under oath by the entity and its members in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. Information that is not a public
 record pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be open to public inspection.

(b) For each RFQ, the department shall generate a final list of qualified persons or firms that participated in the RFQ prior to entering into negotiations on the contract or contracts to which the RFQ applies.

(c) (1) For each contract included in the RFQ, the department shall enter into separate negotiations for the contract with the highest qualified person or firm on the final list for that contract. However, if the RFQ is for multiple contracts and specifies that all of the multiple contracts will be awarded to a single construction manager, there may be a single negotiation for all of
 the multiple contracts. The negotiations shall include consideration of compensation and other contract terms that the department determines to be fair and reasonable to the department. In making this decision, the department shall take into account the estimated value, the scope, the complexity, and the nature of the professional services or construction services to be rendered. If the department is not able to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the highest qualified person or firm on the final list, regarding compensation and on other contract terms the department determines to be fair and reasonable, the department shall formally terminate negotiations with that person or firm. The department may undertake negotiations with the next most qualified person or firm on the final list in sequence until an agreement is reached or a determination is made to reject all persons or firms on the final list.

(2) If a contract for construction services is entered into pursuant to this chapter and includes preconstruction services by the construction manager, the department shall enter into a written contract with the construction manager for preconstruction services under which contract the department shall pay the construction manager a fee for preconstruction services in an amount agreed upon by the department and the construction manager. The preconstruction services contract may include fees for services to be performed during the contract period provided, however, the department shall not request or obtain a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction contract from the construction manager or enter into a construction contract with the construction manager until after the department has entered into a services contract.
 A preconstruction services contract shall provide for the subsequent negotiation for construction of all or any discreet phase or phases of the project.

(3) A contract for construction services shall be awarded after the plans have been sufficiently developed and either a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price has been successfully negotiated. In the event that a fixed price or a guaranteed maximum price is not negotiated, the department shall not award the contract for construction services.

(4) The department is not required to award the construction services contract.

(5) Construction shall not commence on any phase, package, or element until the department and construction manager agree in writing on either
 a fixed price that the department will pay for the construction to be commenced or a guaranteed maximum price for the construction to be commenced and construction schedule for the project. The construction manager shall perform not less than 30 percent of the work covered by the fixed price or guaranteed maximum price agreement reached. Work that is not performed directly by the construction manager shall be bid to subcontractors pursuant to Section 6705.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 354.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

6704.

(a) Any construction manager that is selected to construct a project pursuant to this chapter shall possess or obtain sufficient bonding to cover the contract amount for construction services and risk and liability insurance as the department may require.

(b) Any payment or performance bond written for the purposes of this chapter shall be written using a bond form developed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (AB 2498)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6705.

All subcontractors bidding on contracts pursuant to this chapter shall be afforded the protections contained in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1. The construction manager shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide public notice of the availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the department.

(b) Provide a fixed date and time on which the subcontracted work will be awarded in accordance with the procedure established pursuant to this chapter

(c) Comply
 with any subcontracting procedures adopted by the department that were included in the department’s RFQ. If the department has adopted procedures to prequalify public works contractors, the construction manager may use the procedures to prequalify subcontractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (AB 2498)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6706.

The department may retain the services of a design professional or construction project manager, or both, throughout the course of the project in order to ensure compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (AB 2498)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6707.

Contracts awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be valid until the project is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (AB 2498)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

6708.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to affect, expand, alter, or limit any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 752, Sec. 1.   (AB 2498)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5.  Transportation Design-Build Program [6820. - 6829.]

6820.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by objective criteria, including, but not limited to, price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, and other criteria deemed appropriate by the transportation entity.

(b) “Commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(c) “Design-build” means
 a procurement process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity.

(d) “Design-build entity” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(e) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity itself and the individuals and other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team.

(f) “Department” means the
 Department of Transportation as established under Part 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(g) “Expressway” means expressway as defined in Section 257 of the Streets and Highways Code. 

(h) “Interfacing with the state highway system” means work performed within the state highway right-of-way, including airspace over or under that property, or work performed upon property acquired by the department for construction of a state highway, including airspace over or under that property.

(i) “Regional transportation agency” means any of the following:

(1) A transportation planning agency described in Section 29532 or 29532.1 of the Government Code.

(2) A county transportation commission established under Section 130050, 130050.1, or 130050.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(3) Any other local or regional transportation entity that is designated by statute as a regional transportation agency.

(4) A joint exercise of powers authority established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, with the consent of a transportation planning agency or a county transportation commission for the jurisdiction in which the transportation
 project will be developed.

(5) A local transportation authority designated pursuant to Division 12.5 (commencing with Section 131000) or Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000) of the Public Utilities Code.

(6) The Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority established pursuant to Part 12 (commencing with Section 100000) of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code.

(j) “Transportation entity” means the department or a regional transportation agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6821.

(a) The department may utilize the design-build method of procurement for up to 10 projects, and an additional 6 projects per fiscal year in the 2022–23 and 2023–24 fiscal years, on the state highway system, based on either best value or lowest responsible bid.

(b) A regional transportation agency may utilize the design-build method of procurement to design and construct projects on or adjacent to the state highway system, including related nonhighway portions of the project, based on either best value or lowest responsible bid. A regional
 transportation agency and the department shall enter into a cooperative agreement reflecting the roles and responsibilities assigned by law for a project on or interfacing with the state highway system authorized under this subdivision. The cooperative agreement shall also include the requirement to develop a mutually agreed upon issue resolution process with a primary objective to ensure the project stays on schedule and issues between the parties are resolved in a timely manner.

(c) (1) A regional transportation agency may utilize the design-build method of procurement, based on either best value or lowest responsible bid, to design and construct projects on expressways that are not on the state highway system if the projects are developed in accordance with an expenditure plan approved by voters as of January 1, 2014.

(2) The entity responsible for the
 maintenance of the local streets and roads within the jurisdiction of the expressway shall be responsible for the maintenance of the expressway.

(d) A city, county, or city and county shall not utilize the design-build method of procurement under this chapter. A regional transportation agency shall not utilize the design-build method of procurement on behalf of a city, county, or city and county.

(e) The design-build authorization in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not include the authority to perform construction inspection services for projects on or interfacing with the state highway system, which shall be performed by the department consistent with Section 91.2 of the Streets and Highway Code.

(f) (1) Not later than the first day of July that occurs two years after a design-build contract is
 awarded, and each July 1 thereafter until a project is completed, the department or the regional transportation agency shall submit a report on the progress of the project and compliance with this section to the legislative policy committees having jurisdiction over transportation matters.

(2) The requirement of submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on the first day of July four years after the first report was submitted, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 7.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6822.

The commission shall use the guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 6803, as it read on December 31, 2013, to provide a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity, that performs services for the transportation entity relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team. This conflict-of-interest policy shall apply to the transportation entity entering into design-build contracts authorized under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   (AB 401)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6823.

(a) For contracts for public works projects awarded prior January 1, 2012, a transportation entity authorized to use the design-build method of procurement shall establish and enforce a labor compliance program containing the requirements outlined in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code or shall contract with a third party to operate a labor compliance program containing the requirements outlined in Section 1771.5 of the Labor Code. This requirement shall not apply to projects where the transportation entity or design-build entity has entered into any collective bargaining agreement that binds all of the contractors performing work on the projects.

(b) For contracts for public works projects awarded on or
 after January 1, 2012, the project shall be subject to the requirements of Section 1771.4 of the Labor Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 76.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Repealed conditionally on or before January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 6829.)
-------------------------------------------

6824.

The procurement process for the design-build project shall progress as follows:

(a) A transportation entity shall prepare a set of documents setting forth the scope and estimated price of a project. The documents may include, but need not be limited to, the size, type, and desired design character of the project, performance specifications covering the quality of materials, equipment, workmanship, preliminary plans, and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the transportation entity’s needs. The performance specifications and any plans shall be prepared by a design professional who is duly licensed and registered in California.

(b) Based on the documents prepared as described in subdivision (a), the transportation entity shall prepare a request for proposals that invites interested parties to submit competitive sealed proposals in the manner prescribed by the transportation entity. The request for proposals shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:
